North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 57. Judicial Consent for Emergency Surgical or Medical Treatment. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-732 through 7A-739.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5.

Cross References.

For judicial consent for emergency surgical or medical treatment under the Juvenile Code see now

G.S. 7B-3600

et seq.